test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UHL_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_UHL_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_UHL_STEM_2

     ñáaguhl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñáagulga
     ñáaguhl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáagulgang
     ñáaguhl+V+DIRECT+PAST: ñáagulgan
     ñáaguhl+V+NON_FACTIVE: ñáagul.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñáagulgang
     ñáaguhl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñáagulganggang
     ñáaguhl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñáagulgangang
     ñáaguhl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáagulgiinii
     ñáaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáagulgaangaa
     ñáaguhl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáagulgaangaan
     ñáaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñáagulang ñasa'áa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: ñáagulang ñasa'áang
     ñáaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñáagulang ñasaasdláa
     ñáaguhl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñáagulang ñasaasdláang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñáagulgang'waa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñáagulgang'waang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñáagulgang'waa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñáagulgang'anggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñáagulgang'angang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñáagulang ñasaa'áng
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñáagulang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñáagulang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñáagulang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñáagulgang'ang'waa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñáagulgang'ang'waang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñáagulgang'ang'waa.ang
